Wisconsin, session 2025, AB604.
do enact as follows:AB604,11Section 1. 49.45 (62) of the statutes is created to read:AB604,2,8249.45 (62) Prerelease coverage of incarcerated individuals. (a) The 3department shall submit to the secretary of the federal department of health and 4human services a request for a waiver of federal Medicaid law to conduct a 5demonstration project to provide incarcerated individuals prerelease health care 6coverage for the following services under the Medical Assistance program for up to 790 days preceding the incarcerated individual’s release if the individual is 8otherwise eligible for coverage under the Medical Assistance program:AB604,2,991. Case management services.AB604,2,10102. Medication-assisted treatment for all types of substance use disorders.AB604,2,11113. A 30-day supply of prescription medications.AB604,2,1712(b) If a waiver submitted by the department under par. (a) is approved by the 13federal department of health and human services to provide any or all of the 14services described in par. (a) 1. to 3., or any portion of those services, the 15department shall provide reimbursement under the Medical Assistance program 16for both the federal and nonfederal share of those services provided to incarcerated 17individuals to the extent approved under the waiver.AB604,218Section 2. Nonstatutory provisions.AB604,2,2119(1) No later than January 1, 2027, the department of health services shall 20submit the request for a waiver to provide Medical Assistance coverage with federal 21funding participation as provided under s. 49.45 (62).AB604,2,2222